Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
BALLOT SELECTION

§12-31 Selection of party ballot; voting.
No person eligible to vote in any primary or special primary election shall be
required to state a party preference or nonpartisanship as a condition of
voting. Each voter shall be issued the primary or special primary ballot for
each party and the nonpartisan primary or special primary ballot. A voter
shall be entitled to vote only for candidates of one party or only for
nonpartisan candidates. If the primary or special primary ballot is marked
contrary to this paragraph, the ballot shall not be counted.

In any primary or special primary election in
the year 1979 and thereafter, a voter shall be entitled to select and to vote
the ballot of any one party or nonpartisan, regardless of which ballot the
voter voted in any preceding primary or special primary election. [L 1970, c
26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217, §2(i); am L 1974, c 34, §2(c); am L 1979, c
139, §9; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Constitutional provision, see Const. art. II, §4.

Case Notes

Where plaintiff claimed provisions requiring an open primary
were facially unconstitutional because allowing voters to associate anonymously
with a political party violated a party's First Amendment right of free
association: (1) plaintiff's purely facial challenge to the open primary
failed; and (2) the court could not assess whether plaintiff's associational
rights were burdened without considering evidence as to the extent, if any, of
that burden. 982 F. Supp. 2d 1166 (2013).

Selection of a party's ballot does not automatically make
voter a party member. 56 H. 519, 542 P.2d 1272.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next